Maine, session 132, LD1552.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 14 MRSA §6030-K is enacted to read:
§6030-K. Prohibition on using algorithmic device or artificial intelligence in setting
rent
A landlord or any other person responsible for setting the amount of rent to be paid by
a tenant for the occupancy of a residential rental property may not use an algorithmic device
or artificial intelligence in setting the amount of rent to be paid by a tenant for the
occupancy of a residential property, including determining any change in the amount of
rent to be paid by a tenant for a renewal of occupancy. For purposes of this section
"algorithmic device" means a device that uses one or more algorithms to perform
calculations of data, including data concerning local or statewide rent amounts being
charged to tenants by landlords, for the purpose of advising a landlord concerning the
amount of rent that a landlord may consider charging a tenant. For purposes of this section
"artificial intelligence" means an engineered or machine-based system that varies in its
level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer from the input it
receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical or virtual environments.
A violation of this section is considered an unfair trade practice under Title 5, chapter
10.